Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5612.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-36.2 of the General Laws entitled "Promotion of Biofuels Act of
2011" is hereby repealed in its entirety.
CHAPTER 31-36.2
Promotion of Biofuels Act of 2011
31-36.2-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Promotion of Biofuels Act of 2011.”
31-36.2-2. Biofuels study commission established.
(a) Membership. There is hereby established a special study commission to study the
feasibility and effectiveness of various forms of incentives to promote the development and use of
advanced biofuels in the state including, but not limited to: production credits, the production and
harvesting of woody biomass or woody residue, feedstock incentives, and direct consumer credits
for the use of advanced biofuels in various applications. Said commission shall be known as the
Biofuels Study Commission and shall be comprised of fifteen (15) members: five (5) of whom shall
be members of the house of representatives, not more than four (4) from the same political party,
to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; three (3) of whom shall be members
of the senate, not more than two (2) from the same political party, to be appointed by the senate
president; one of whom shall be the director of the department of environmental management, or
his or her designee; one of whom shall be employed by an independent organization in the field of

the environment and fuels, to be appointed by the speaker of the house; one of whom shall be the
director of the office of energy resources, or his or her designee; three (3) of whom shall be
employed by companies that work in and/or who themselves work in the field of advanced biofuels,
to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and one of whom shall be from the
University of Rhode Island cooperative extension, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(b) Purpose. The purpose of the commission shall be to investigate and develop a strategy
to increase the use of advanced biofuels as alternatives to conventional carbon-based fuels by the
state, its agencies and political subdivisions and regional transit authorities, and also to promote the
use of such fuels in all sectors of the state, both private and public. In conducting its investigation
and study, the commission shall consider biofuel incentive programs in other states and the states’
relative competitiveness in the field.
(c) Information furnished. All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish any
advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the commission and its agents that is
deemed necessary or desirable by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.
(d) The commission shall report to the general assembly on the results of its investigations
and study and its recommendations, if any, on or before January 23, 2012, and at least every two
(2) years thereafter on its continued findings and the results of its studies, and shall make such
recommendations to the general assembly as it deems advisable.
31-36.2-3. Further study purposes of biofuels study commission.
(a) The biofuels study commission established pursuant to the provisions of this chapter
shall explore the possibility of developing and entering into, to the extent possible, an agreement
among those states participating in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative, for the purpose of
implementing a low carbon fuel standard (hereinafter referred to as “LCFS”), for transportation
fuels. Provided, the commission is not authorized to, nor shall the commission enter into any form
of agreement, contract, compact, memorandum of understanding, or similar document or
arrangement.
(b) By way of guidance, in developing proposed agreements, such agreements should seek
to provide for the following, when reasonably possible:
(1) That LCFS shall be measured on a full fuels lifecycle basis;
(2) That LCFS may be met through market-based methods by which providers exceeding
the performance required by an LCFS shall receive credits that may be applied to future obligations
or traded to providers not meeting the LCFS;
(3) That agreement shall establish a declining standard for greenhouse gas emissions
LC001031 - Page 2 of 4

measured in CO2-equivalent grams per unit of fuel energy sold, sufficient to achieve a ten percent
(10%) reduction in the carbon content of all passenger vehicle fuels sold in participating states; and
(4) That the state shall, with the other states participating in the agreement, examine the
regulations and implementation of a low carbon fuel standard in California and other states and
consider ways to coordinate and issue public findings on both such matters, and if applicable, use
in the agreement the life-cycle analysis methods employed by the California Air Resources Board
to determine the carbon intensity of fuel. The state shall, with other states, adopt life-cycle
emissions accounting standards that are consistent with the EPA’s recently revised regulations for
the federal renewable fuel standard.
31-36.2-4. Biofuels as alternatives to carbon-based fuels.
(a) In addition to the preceding provisions of this chapter, the biofuels study commission
shall investigate and develop a strategy to increase the use of advanced biofuels as alternatives to
conventional carbon-based fuels by the state, its agencies and political subdivisions and regional
transit authorities.
(b) The commission shall develop strategies to increase the use of advanced biofuels by
the state, its agencies and political subdivisions and regional transit authorities and methods to
advance those strategies. Methods to be considered shall include, but not be limited to: financing
mechanisms including grants, loans and other incentive programs for group procurement of
advanced biofuels, vehicles using advanced biofuels and distribution infrastructure and technical
assistance.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001031
========
LC001031 - Page 3 of 4